Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DISPOSITION OF HUMAN BODIES
SECTION 1.  ORS 97.010 is amended to read:
97.010. As  used in ORS 97.010 to 97.040, 97.110 to 97.450, 97.510 to 97.730, 97.810 to 97.920, 97.923
to 97.949, 97.990 and 97.994:
(1) “Alkaline hydrolysis” or  “hydrolysis” means the technical process for reducing human
remains by placing the remains in a dissolution chamber that uses heat, pressure, water  and
base chemical agents, in a licensed hydrolysis facility, to  reduce human remains to bone
fragments and essential elements.
(2) “Alternative disposition facility”  means a structure containing equipment purposed
for reduction.
[(1)] (3) “Burial” means the placement of human remains in a grave or lawn crypt.
[(2)] (4) “Burial park” means a tract of land for the burial of human remains, used, or intended
to be used, and dedicated for cemetery purposes.
[(3)] (5) “Burial right” means the right to use a grave,  mausoleum, columbarium, ossuary or
scattering garden for the interment or other disposition of human remains.
[(4)] (6) “Cemetery” means a place:
(a) Dedicated to and used, or intended  to be used, for a permanent memorial or the permanent
interment of human remains; and
(b) That may contain a mausoleum, crypt or vault interment, a columbarium,  an ossuary, a
cenotaph, a scattering garden, any other structure  or place used or intended to be used for the
interment or disposition of human remains or any combination of these structures or places.
[(5)] (7) “Cemetery association” means a corporation or association authorized by  its articles
of incorporation to conduct the business of a cemetery, but does not include a corporation sole or
a charitable, eleemosynary association or corporation.
[(6)] (8) “Cemetery authority” means a person who owns or  controls cemetery lands or property,
including but not limited to a cemetery corporation, association or corporation sole.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 1
[(7)] (9) “Cemetery business” and “cemetery purpose” are used interchangeably and  mean any
business or purpose requisite or incident to, or necessary for establishing, maintaining,  operating,
improving or conducting a cemetery, interring human remains, and the  care, preservation and
embellishment of cemetery property.
[(8)] (10) “Cemetery merchandise” means personal  property offered for sale or sold for use in
connection  with  the final disposition, memorialization or interment of human remains. “Cemetery
merchandise” includes, but is not limited to, an outer burial container and a memorial.
[(9)] (11) “Cemetery services” means services provided by a  cemetery authority for interment
or scattering, and installation of cemetery merchandise.
[(10)] (12) “Cenotaph” means a place,  the primary purpose of which is to provide an area where
a person may pay to establish a memorial to honor  a person whose remains may be interred else-
where or whose remains cannot be recovered.
[(11)] (13) “Columbarium” means a structure or room containing receptacles for permanent
inurnment of cremated or reduced remains in a place used, or intended to be used, and  dedicated
for cemetery purposes.
[(12)] (14) “Cremated remains” means the remains  of a cremated human body after completion
of the cremation process.
[(13)] (15) “Cremation” means the technical  process, using direct flame and heat, that reduces
human remains to bone fragments.
[(14)] (16) “Crematory” means  a structure containing a retort for the reduction of bodies of de-
ceased persons to cremated remains.
[(15)] (17) “Crypt” or “vault” means a space in a mausoleum of sufficient size  used, or intended
to be used, to entomb uncremated or unreduced human remains.
[(16)] (18) “Directors”  or “governing body” means the board of directors, board of trustees or
other governing body of a cemetery association.
[(17)] (19) “Endowment care” means the general care and maintenance of developed portions of
a cemetery and memorials erected thereon financed from the income of a trust fund.
[(18)] (20) “Entombment” means the placement of human remains in a crypt or vault.
[(19)] (21) “Funeral merchandise” means personal property offered for sale or sold for use in
connection with funeral services. “Funeral merchandise” includes, but is not limited to,  acknowl-
edgment cards, alternative containers, caskets,  clothing, cremation containers, cremation interment
containers, flowers, memory  folders, monuments, outer burial containers, prayer cards, register
books and urns.
[(20)] (22) “Funeral services” means services customarily provided by  a funeral service practi-
tioner including, but not limited to, care and preparation of human  remains for final disposition,
professional  services  relating to a funeral or an alternative to a funeral, transportation of human
remains, limousine services, use of facilities or  equipment for viewing human remains, visitation,
memorial services or services that are used in connection with a funeral or alternative to a funeral,
coordinating or conducting funeral rites or ceremonies, and other services provided in  connection
with a funeral, alternative to a funeral or final disposition of human remains.
[(21)] (23) “Grave” means a space of ground in a burial park used, or intended to  be used, for
burial of the remains of one person.
[(22)] (24) “Human remains” or “remains” means the body of a deceased person in any stage of
decomposition or after cremation or reduction.
[(23)] (25) “Interment” means  the disposition of human remains by inurnment, entombment or
burial.
[(24)] (26) “Inurnment” means the  placement of cremated or reduced remains in a receptacle
and the deposit of the receptacle in a niche.
[(25)] (27) “Lot,” “plot” or “burial space” means space in a cemetery owned by one or more in-
dividuals, an association  or fraternal or other organization and used, or intended to be used, for the
permanent interment therein of the remains of one or more deceased persons. Such terms include
and apply with like effect to one, or more than one, adjoining grave, crypt, vault or niche.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 2
[(26)] (28) “Mausoleum” means a structure substantially  exposed above ground for the
entombment of human remains in crypts or vaults in a place used, or intended to be used, and  ded-
icated for cemetery purposes.
[(27)] (29) “Memorial” means a product, other than a mausoleum  or columbarium, used for
identifying an interment space or for commemoration of the life, deeds or career  of a decedent in-
cluding, but  not limited to, an ossuary, monument, marker, niche plate, urn garden plaque, crypt
plate, cenotaph, marker bench or vase.
(30) “Natural organic reduction” means the contained, accelerated conversion of human
remains to soil.
[(28)] (31) “Niche” means a recess usually in a columbarium used, or intended to  be used, for
the inurnment of the cremated or reduced remains of one or more persons.
[(29)] (32) “Ossuary” means a receptacle used for the communal placement  of cremated or re-
duced remains without benefit of an  urn or any other container in which cremated or reduced re-
mains may be commingled with other cremated or reduced remains and are nonrecoverable.
[(30)] (33) “Plot owner” or “owner” means any person identified in the records  of the cemetery
authority as owner of the burial  rights to a burial plot, or who holds a certificate of ownership
conveyed from the cemetery authority of the burial rights in a particular lot, plot or space.
(34) “Reduced remains” means the remains of a  human body after completion of re-
duction.
(35) “Reduction” means alkaline hydrolysis, natural organic reduction  and any other
method of final disposition of human remains authorized  by the State Mortuary and Ceme-
tery Board.
[(31)] (36) “Scattering” means the lawful dispersion of cremated or reduced remains  that need
not be associated with an interment right or issuance of a  deed, that may be recorded only as a
service that has taken place and may  not be recorded on the permanent records of the cemetery
authority.
[(32)] (37) “Scattering  garden” means a location set aside within a cemetery that is used for the
spreading or broadcasting of cremated or reduced  remains that  have been removed from their
container and can be mixed with or  placed on top of the soil or ground cover or buried in an
underground receptacle on a commingled basis and that are nonrecoverable.
[(33)] (38) “Special care” means any care  in excess of endowed care in accordance with the
specific directions of a donor of funds.
SECTION 2.  ORS 97.130 is amended to read:
97.130. (1) Any individual of sound mind who is 18 years of age or older,  by completion of a
written signed instrument or by preparing or  prearranging with any funeral service practitioner li-
censed under ORS chapter 692, may direct  any lawful manner of disposition of the individual’s re-
mains. Except  as provided under subsection (7) of this section, disposition directions or disposition
prearrangements that are prepaid or that are  filed with a funeral service practitioner licensed under
ORS chapter 692 are not subject to cancellation or substantial revision.
(2) A person within the first applicable listed  class among the following listed classes that is
available  at  the time of death, in the absence of actual notice of a contrary direction by the
decedent as described  under subsection (1) of this section or actual notice of opposition by com-
pletion of a written instrument by a member of  the same class or a member of a prior class, may
direct any lawful manner of disposition of a decedent’s  remains by completion of a written instru-
ment:
(a) The spouse of the decedent.
(b) A son or daughter of the decedent 18 years of age or older.
(c) Either parent of the decedent.
(d) A brother or sister of the decedent 18 years of age or older.
(e) A guardian of the decedent at the time of death.
(f) A person in the next degree of kindred to the decedent.
(g) The personal representative of the estate of the decedent.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 3
(h) The person nominated  as the personal representative of the decedent in the decedent’s last
will.
(i) A public health officer.
(3)(a) The  decedent or any person authorized in subsection (2) of this section to direct the
manner of disposition of  the decedent’s remains may delegate such authority to any person 18 years
of age or older.
(b) Delegation of the authority to direct the manner of disposition  of remains must be made by
completion  of:
(A) The written instrument described in subsection (8) of this section; or
(B) The form described in subsection (4) of this section.
(c) The person to whom the authority is delegated  has the same authority under subsection (2)
of this section as the person delegating the authority.
(4)(a) A Record of Emergency Data, DD Form 93, or a successor form recognized by  the Armed
Forces of the United States, as that term is defined in  ORS 348.282, completed by a member of the
Armed Forces of the United States serves as a valid written instrument  for purposes of subsection
(3) of this section.
(b) In accordance with United States Department of Defense Instruction 1300.18, a member of
the Armed Forces  of the United States shall complete the form described in this subsection and shall
verify the accuracy of the form at least annually.
(c) The form described  in this subsection, regardless of the date on which the form was signed,
supersedes any other written instrument that directs the disposition of the decedent’s remains.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (4)(c) of this section,  if a decedent or the decedent’s
designee issues more than one authorization or direction for the disposal  of the decedent’s remains,
only the most recent authorization or direction is binding.
(6) A donation of anatomical gifts under ORS 97.951 to 97.982 takes priority over directions for
the disposition of a decedent’s remains under this section only if the person  making the donation is
of a priority under subsection (1) or (2) of this section the same as or  higher than the priority of the
person directing the disposition of the remains.
(7) If the decedent directs a disposition under subsection (1) of this section and  those financially
responsible for the  disposition are without sufficient funds to pay for such disposition or the estate
of the decedent has insufficient funds to pay for the  disposition, or if the direction is unlawful, the
direction is void and disposition shall be in accordance with the direction  provided by the person
given priority in subsection (2) of this section and who agrees to be financially responsible.
(8) The signature of  the individual delegating the authority to direct the manner of disposition
is required for the  completion of the written instrument required in subsection (3)(b)(A) of this sec-
tion. The following form or a form substantially similar shall be used by all individuals:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
APPOINTMENT OF PERSON
TO MAKE DECISIONS
CONCERNING DISPOSITION
OF REMAINS
I, 
, appoint , whose address is
 and whose telephone number is  ( ) , as the person
to make all decisions regarding the disposition of my remains upon my death for  my burial [ or],
cremation  or alternative disposition . In the event  is unable to act, I  appoint
, whose  address is  and whose telephone num-
ber is ( ) , as  my alternate person to make all decisions regarding the disposi-
tion of my remains upon my death for my burial [ or], cremation  or alternative disposition .
It is my intent  that this Appointment of Person to Make Decisions Concerning Disposition of
Remains act  as and be accepted as the written authorization presently required by ORS 97.130 (or
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 4
its corresponding future  provisions) or any other provision of Oregon Law, authorizing me to name
a person to have authority to dispose of my remains.
DATED this  day of , .
(Signature)
DECLARATION OF WITNESSES
We declare that  is personally known to us, that  he/she signed this Ap-
pointment of Person to Make Decisions Concerning Disposition of Remains in our  presence, that
he/she appeared to be of sound mind and not  acting under duress, fraud or undue influence, and that
neither of us is the person so appointed by this document.
Witnessed By:
Date: 
Witnessed By:
Date: 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(9) Subject to the provisions of ORS 97.951 to 97.982, if  disposition of the remains of a decedent
has not been directed and authorized under this section within 10 days after the  date of the death
of the decedent, a public health officer may direct and authorize disposition of the remains.
(10) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a  person arrested for or charged with crim-
inal homicide by reason of the death of the  decedent may not direct the disposition of the decedent’s
remains. The disposition of the  decedent’s remains shall be made in accordance with the directions
of an eligible person within the first applicable class established under  subsection (2) of this section.
(11) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if the person who has  the authority
to direct the manner of  disposition of cremated or reduced remains pursuant to subsection (1) or
(2) of this section transfers any portion of the cremated  or reduced  remains to  another person, the
recipient of the cremated or reduced remains has the authority to direct the  manner of disposition
of the cremated or reduced remains in the recipient’s possession.
SECTION 3.  ORS 97.130, as amended by  section 12a, chapter 384, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
97.130. (1) Any individual of  sound mind who is 18 years of age or older, by completion of a
written signed instrument or by preparing or prearranging  with any funeral service practitioner li-
censed under ORS chapter 692, may direct any lawful manner  of disposition of the individual’s re-
mains. Except as provided under subsection (7) of this section, disposition directions or  disposition
prearrangements that are prepaid or that are  filed with a funeral service practitioner licensed under
ORS chapter 692 are not subject to cancellation or substantial revision.
(2) A person within the first applicable listed class  among the following listed classes that is
available at the time of death, in the absence of actual notice of a contrary direction by  the
decedent as described under subsection (1) of this section or actual notice of opposition  by com-
pletion of a written instrument by a member of the same class  or a member of a prior class, may
direct any lawful manner of disposition of a  decedent’s remains by completion of a written instru-
ment:
(a) The spouse of the decedent.
(b) A son or daughter of the decedent 18 years of age or older.
(c) Either parent of the decedent.
(d) A brother or sister of the decedent 18 years of age or older.
(e) A guardian of the decedent at the time of death.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 5
(f) A person in the next degree of kindred to the decedent.
(g) The personal representative of the estate of the decedent.
(h) The person nominated as the personal representative of the decedent in  the decedent’s last
will.
(i) A public health officer.
(3)(a) The decedent or any person authorized in subsection (2) of this section to direct  the
manner of disposition of  the decedent’s remains may delegate such authority to any person 18 years
of age or older.
(b) Delegation of the authority to direct  the manner of disposition of remains must be made by
completion of:
(A) The written instrument described in subsection (8) of this section; or
(B) The form described in subsection (4) of this section.
(c) The person to whom the authority is  delegated has the same authority under subsection (2)
of this section as the person delegating the authority.
(4)(a) A Record of Emergency Data, DD Form 93, or a successor form recognized by  the Armed
Forces of the United States, as that term is  defined in ORS 366.931, completed by a member of the
Armed Forces of the United  States serves as a valid written instrument for purposes of subsection
(3) of this section.
(b) In accordance with United States Department of Defense Instruction 1300.18, a member of
the Armed Forces  of the United States shall complete the form described in this subsection and shall
verify the accuracy of the form at least annually.
(c) The form described in this subsection, regardless of the date on which the  form was signed,
supersedes any other written instrument that directs the disposition of the decedent’s remains.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (4)(c)  of this section, if a decedent or the decedent’s
designee issues more than one authorization or direction for the disposal  of the decedent’s remains,
only the most recent authorization or direction is binding.
(6) A donation of anatomical gifts under ORS 97.951 to 97.982 takes priority over directions for
the disposition of a decedent’s remains under this section only if the person  making the donation is
of a priority under subsection (1) or (2) of this section the same as or  higher than the priority of the
person directing the disposition of the remains.
(7) If the decedent directs a disposition under subsection (1) of this section and  those financially
responsible for the disposition are without sufficient funds to pay for such disposition or  the estate
of the decedent has insufficient funds to pay for  the disposition, or if the direction is unlawful, the
direction is void and disposition  shall be in accordance with the direction provided by the person
given priority in subsection (2) of this section and who agrees to be financially responsible.
(8) The signature of the individual delegating the authority to direct the  manner of disposition
is required for the completion of the written instrument required in subsection (3)(b)(A)  of this sec-
tion. The following form or a form substantially similar shall be used by all individuals:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
APPOINTMENT OF PERSON
TO MAKE DECISIONS
CONCERNING DISPOSITION
OF REMAINS
I, 
, appoint , whose address is
 and whose telephone number is  ( ) , as the person
to make all decisions  regarding the disposition of my remains upon my death for my burial [ or],
cremation  or alternative disposition . In the event  is unable to act, I  appoint
, whose address is  and whose telephone  num-
ber is ( ) , as my alternate person to make all  decisions regarding the disposi-
tion of my remains upon my death for my burial [ or], cremation  or alternative disposition .
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 6
It is my intent that this Appointment of Person to Make Decisions  Concerning Disposition of
Remains act as and be accepted as the written authorization presently required by ORS 97.130  (or
its corresponding future provisions) or any other provision of Oregon Law, authorizing me  to name
a person to have authority to dispose of my remains.
DATED this  day of , .
(Signature)
DECLARATION OF WITNESSES
We declare that  is personally known to us, that  he/she signed this Ap-
pointment of Person to Make Decisions Concerning Disposition of Remains in our  presence, that
he/she appeared to be of sound mind and not  acting under duress, fraud or undue influence, and that
neither of us is the person so appointed by this document.
Witnessed By:
Date: 
Witnessed By:
Date: 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(9) Subject to the provisions of ORS 97.951 to 97.982, if  disposition of the remains of a decedent
has not been directed and authorized under this section within 10 days after the  date of the death
of the decedent, a public health officer may direct and authorize disposition of the remains.
(10) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a  person arrested for or charged with crim-
inal homicide by reason of the death of the  decedent may not direct the disposition of the decedent’s
remains. The disposition of the  decedent’s remains shall be made in accordance with the directions
of an eligible person within the first applicable class established under  subsection (2) of this section.
(11) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if the person who has  the authority
to direct the manner of  disposition of cremated or reduced remains pursuant to subsection (1) or
(2) of this section transfers any portion of the cremated  or reduced  remains to  another person, the
recipient of the cremated or reduced remains has the authority to direct the  manner of disposition
of the cremated or reduced remains in the recipient’s possession.
SECTION 4.  ORS 97.145 is amended to read:
97.145. No cemetery authority, crematory operator , alternative disposition facility operator
or licensed funeral service  practitioner interring [ or], cremating or reducing remains pursuant to
a written instrument signed by the decedent or a person described in ORS 97.130 (2) shall be  liable
for any failure to conform to the priority of control of remains provided in ORS 97.130, except when
it shall have received two or more conflicting written instruments prior  to interment [ or], cremation
or reduction of said remains.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 97.150 is amended to read:
97.150. (1)(a) If the cemetery authority, crematory  operator , alternative disposition facility
operator or licensed funeral service practitioner has been  authorized to cremate or reduce remains
of a decedent pursuant to ORS 97.130, the authorization must also contain further instructions  to
the cemetery authority, crematory operator , alternative disposition facility operator  or licensed
funeral service practitioner as to the final disposition of the cremated or reduced remains.
(b) If the cremated or reduced remains are left in the possession of the  cemetery authority,
crematory operator , alternative disposition facility operator  or licensed funeral service practi-
tioner and no instructions for final  disposition are given to the cemetery authority, crematory op-
erator , alternative disposition facility operator  or licensed funeral  service practitioner within 180
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 7
days after  the date of cremation or reduction, the cemetery authority, crematory operator , alter-
native disposition facility operator  or licensed funeral service practitioner shall make a reason-
able effort to notify the person who has the authority to direct disposition of the  cremated or
reduced remains under ORS 97.130 (2). The notice must state that the cemetery authority,
crematory operator , alternative disposition facility operator  or licensed funeral service practi-
tioner intends to dispose of the cremated or reduced remains unless the person who has the au-
thority to direct disposition of the cremated or reduced remains gives instructions  to the contrary
to the cemetery authority, crematory operator , alternative  disposition facility operator  or li-
censed funeral service practitioner within 30 days after the date of the notice.
(c) Reasonable effort to notify includes, but is not limited to,  notice, delivered personally or by
certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person  who has the authority to direct disposition
of the cremated or reduced remains at the address of the  person in the records of the cemetery
authority, crematory operator , alternative disposition facility operator  or licensed funeral service
practitioner.
(d) If the person who has the authority to direct the  disposition of the cremated or reduced
remains has not given instructions  for the disposition of the cremated or reduced remains within
30 days after the date of the notice, the  cemetery authority, crematory operator , alternative dis-
position facility operator or licensed funeral service practitioner may dispose of the cremated or
reduced remains as is legally practicable.
(2) A cemetery authority, crematory operator , alternative disposition facility operator  or li-
censed funeral service practitioner is not liable in any civil  or criminal proceeding relating to
cremated or reduced  remains that have been left in  the possession of the cemetery authority,
crematory operator , alternative disposition facility operator  or licensed funeral service practi-
tioner for a period of 180 days or more unless:
(a) The cemetery authority, crematory operator , alternative disposition facility operator  or
licensed funeral service practitioner  has failed to make a reasonable effort to notify the person who
has the authority to direct disposition of  the cremated  or reduced  remains as described in sub-
section (1) of this section;
(b) A written contract has been entered into with the cemetery authority, crematory  operator ,
alternative disposition facility operator  or licensed funeral service practitioner for care of the
cremated or reduced remains; or
(c) Permanent interment has been made.
(3) A cemetery authority  is not liable in any civil or criminal proceeding relating to cremated
or reduced remains that have  been interred, scattered, placed in an ossuary or disposed of in any
other manner within the  cemetery if the person who physically possesses the cremated or reduced
remains consents to the disposition.
(4) A cemetery authority is not liable in any civil or criminal proceeding  relating to cremated
or reduced  remains that  have been scattered within the cemetery without the knowledge of the
cemetery authority. The cemetery authority  may dispose of cremated or reduced remains that have
been scattered within the cemetery  without the knowledge of the cemetery authority as is legally
practicable.
(5) If the cemetery authority, crematory operator , alternative disposition facility operator  or
licensed funeral service practitioner has complied with this section, then the cemetery authority,
crematory operator , alternative disposition facility operator  or licensed funeral service practi-
tioner may dispose of the remains as is legally practicable.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 97.153 is amended to read:
97.153. Notwithstanding section 14, chapter 653, Oregon Laws 1991,  or ORS 469.525, diagnostic
or therapeutic radioisotopes remaining inside the uncremated or unreduced body  of a deceased
person may be buried, entombed or otherwise disposed of  in a cemetery or other lawful place for the
burial, entombment or other disposal of the uncremated or unreduced body of the  deceased person
even though the body contains low-level radioactive waste as defined  under 42 U.S.C. 2021(b) as of
January 1, 1995, by-product material as defined under 42  U.S.C. 2014 as of January 1, 1995, or spe-
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 8
cial nuclear material exempted by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission as of January
1, 1995, under authority of 42 U.S.C. 2077(d).
SECTION 7.
 ORS 97.170 is amended to read:
97.170. (1) As used  in this section, “indigent person” means a deceased person who does not
have a  death or final expense benefit or insurance policy that pays for disposition of the deceased
person’s body or other means to pay for disposition of the deceased person’s body and:
(a) Who does not have a relative or other person with the legal right to direct and the means
to pay for disposition of the deceased person’s body;
(b) Whose relative, or other person, with the legal right to  direct the disposition of the deceased
person’s body  does not pay or arrange to pay for, or refuses to direct, the disposition of the deceased
person’s body within 10 days of being notified of the death; or
(c) For whom no person other than a  person described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection
wishes to direct and pay for the disposition of the deceased person’s body.
(2) The State Mortuary and Cemetery Board shall maintain a  list of institutions that may accept
or process bodies for education or research purposes.
(3)(a) A funeral establishment licensed under ORS 692.146 that takes custody  of the unclaimed
body of a deceased person shall, within five days after taking custody of the body:
(A) Submit a report of death under ORS 432.133;
(B) Obtain all contact information known to the medical examiner,  a health care facility or law
enforcement regarding persons listed in ORS 97.130;
(C) Attempt to locate and notify the persons listed in ORS 97.130;
(D) Arrange with any person listed in ORS 97.130 who  will pay the expenses to make disposition
of the body;
(E) If no person listed in ORS 97.130 can be located to pay the expenses to make disposition of
the body, arrange with  a person or institution not listed in ORS 97.130 that will pay the expenses
to make disposition of the body;
(F) Determine whether the Department of State Lands  or other person is appointed as the per-
sonal representative of the deceased person pursuant to ORS 113.085; and
(G) Contact the  Department of Veterans’ Affairs to determine whether the decedent is eligible
for any state or federal benefits.
(b) If no one claims the body within 10 days after the funeral establishment takes  custody of the
body, or if the persons notified acquiesce,  or if the decedent is not eligible for any benefits described
in paragraph  (a)(G) of this subsection, the funeral establishment may transfer the body to an insti-
tution on the list of institutions described in subsection (2) of this section that desires the body for
education or research purposes.
(c) If no person or institution claims the body as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection, the funeral establishment may cremate or reduce or bury the  body without the consent
of persons listed in ORS 97.130 and is indemnified from any liability arising from  having made such
disposition. The method of disposition must be in the  least costly and most environmentally sound
manner that complies with law, and that does not conflict with known wishes of  the deceased. If the
deceased  person  is an indigent person, the board shall reimburse the funeral establishment for the
costs of disposition under subsection (5) of this section.
(4) If the deceased person is a child over whom the Department of Human Services  held
guardianship at the time of death, the department shall promptly attempt to  locate and notify the
relatives of the deceased child or any other person who has an interest  in the deceased child and
shall arrange with any person who will pay the  expenses to make disposition of the body. If no
relatives or interested persons claim the body, the  department may transfer the body to an institu-
tion that is on the list maintained by the board under subsection (2) of  this section that desires the
body for education or research purposes, or may authorize burial or cremation or reduction of the
body. The department shall pay expenses related to burial or cremation or reduction authorized
by the department under this subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 9
(5) Upon receipt of a qualifying statement  as required by the board by rule that the deceased
person is an indigent person, the board shall reimburse a funeral establishment the reasonable  costs
for disposition of the body of any unclaimed deceased indigent person. The  method of disposition
must be  in the least costly and most environmentally sound manner that complies with law. The
board shall adopt rules establishing the requirements and process for reimbursement and  setting the
amount that may be reimbursed to a funeral establishment under this subsection.
SECTION 8.  ORS 97.170, as amended by section 53, chapter 678, Oregon Laws  2019, is amended
to read:
97.170. (1) As used  in this section, “indigent person” means a deceased person who does not
have a  death or final expense benefit or insurance policy that pays for disposition of the deceased
person’s body or other means to pay for disposition of the deceased person’s body and:
(a) Who does not have a relative or other person with the legal right to direct and the means
to pay for disposition of the deceased person’s body;
(b) Whose relative, or other person, with the legal right to  direct the disposition of the deceased
person’s body  does not pay or arrange to pay for, or refuses to direct, the disposition of the deceased
person’s body within 10 days of being notified of the death; or
(c) For whom no person other than a  person described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection
wishes to direct and pay for the disposition of the deceased person’s body.
(2) The State Mortuary and Cemetery Board shall maintain a  list of institutions that may accept
or process bodies for education or research purposes.
(3)(a) A funeral establishment licensed under ORS 692.146 that takes custody  of the unclaimed
body of a deceased person shall, within five days after taking custody of the body:
(A) Submit a report of death under ORS 432.133;
(B) Obtain all contact information known to the medical examiner,  a health care facility or law
enforcement regarding persons listed in ORS 97.130;
(C) Attempt to locate and notify the persons listed in ORS 97.130;
(D) Arrange with any person listed in ORS 97.130 who  will pay the expenses to make disposition
of the body;
(E) If no person listed in ORS 97.130 can be located to pay the expenses to make disposition of
the body, arrange with  a person or institution not listed in ORS 97.130 that will pay the expenses
to make disposition of the body;
(F) Determine whether the State Treasurer  or other person is appointed as the personal repre-
sentative of the deceased person pursuant to ORS 113.085; and
(G) Contact the  Department of Veterans’ Affairs to determine whether the decedent is eligible
for any state or federal benefits.
(b) If no one claims the body within 10 days after the funeral establishment takes  custody of the
body, or if the persons notified acquiesce,  or if the decedent is not eligible for any benefits described
in paragraph  (a)(G) of this subsection, the funeral establishment may transfer the body to an insti-
tution on the list of institutions described in subsection (2) of this section that desires the body for
education or research purposes.
(c) If no person or institution claims the body as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection, the funeral establishment may cremate or reduce or bury the  body without the consent
of persons listed in ORS 97.130 and is indemnified from any liability arising from  having made such
disposition. The method of disposition must be in the  least costly and most environmentally sound
manner that complies with law, and that does not conflict with known wishes of  the deceased. If the
deceased  person  is an indigent person, the board shall reimburse the funeral establishment for the
costs of disposition under subsection (5) of this section.
(4) If the deceased person is a child over whom the Department of Human Services  held
guardianship at the time of death, the department shall promptly attempt to  locate and notify the
relatives of the deceased child or any other person who has an interest  in the deceased child and
shall arrange with any person who will pay the  expenses to make disposition of the body. If no
relatives or interested persons claim the body, the  department may transfer the body to an institu-
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 10
tion that is on the list maintained by the board under subsection (2) of  this section that desires the
body for education or research purposes, or may authorize burial or cremation or reduction of the
body. The department shall pay expenses related to burial or cremation or reduction authorized
by the department under this subsection.
(5) Upon receipt of a qualifying statement as required by the  board by rule that the deceased
person is an indigent person, the board shall reimburse a funeral establishment the reasonable  costs
for disposition of the  body of any unclaimed deceased indigent person. The method of disposition
must be in the least costly and most environmentally sound manner that complies with law.  The
board shall adopt rules establishing the requirements and process for reimbursement and  setting the
amount that may be reimbursed to a funeral establishment under this subsection.
SECTION 9.  ORS 97.200 is amended to read:
97.200. (1) An institution that uses a body for ongoing research  pursuant to ORS 97.170 shall
bury respectfully  or cremate  or reduce  the remains upon completion of use. If the institution
cremates or reduces  the remains, the institution shall deliver  the [ ashes] cremated or reduced
remains to a relative of the deceased person if a  relative is known to the institution. If no relative
is known to the  institution, the institution shall hold the [ ashes] cremated or reduced remains  for
three years after cremation  or reduction  and may then  dispose of the [ ashes] cremated or reduced
remains in a respectful manner. The institution shall pay burial, cremation , reduction, storage and
delivery expenses for a body the institution used pursuant to ORS 97.170.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, an institution that uses a body pursuant to
ORS 97.170 only for instruction on preservation of a body shall, upon completion of use,  return the
body to the funeral establishment from where the institution received the body.
SECTION 10.  ORS 97.220 is amended to read:
97.220. (1) Except as provided in ORS 97.223, the remains  of a deceased person interred in a plot
in a cemetery may be removed from the plot with the consent of the cemetery  authority and written
consent of:
(a) The person under ORS  97.130 (2)(a), (b) or (c) who has the authority to direct disposition of
the remains of the deceased person; or
(b) If the remains are cremated or reduced  remains, the person who had possession of the
cremated or reduced remains and authorized the interment of the cremated or reduced remains.
(2) If the consent of a person described in subsection (1) of this section or  of the cemetery au-
thority cannot be obtained, permission by the county court of the  county where the cemetery is
situated is sufficient. Notice of application to the court for such permission must be  given at least
60 days prior thereto, personally or by mail, to the cemetery authority, to  the person not consenting
and to every other person or authority on whom service of notice is required by the county court.
(3) If the payment for the purchase of an interment space is past due for  a period of 90 days or
more, this section does not apply to or prohibit the removal of  any remains from one plot to another
in the same cemetery or the  removal of remains by the cemetery authority from a plot to some other
suitable place.
(4) This section does not apply to the disinterment of remains upon order  of court or if ordered
under the provisions of ORS 146.045 (3)(e).
SECTION 11.  ORS 97.510 is amended to read:
97.510. (1) After filing the map or plat and recording the declaration of dedication, a cemetery
authority may sell and convey plots subject to such rules and regulations  as may be then in effect
and subject to such other and further limitations, conditions and restrictions made a part  of the
declaration of dedication by reference or included in the instrument of conveyance of the plot.
(2) Scattering of cremated or reduced  remains  in a scattering garden is not a sale or
conveyance.
SECTION 12.  ORS 97.660 is amended to read:
97.660. A nonprofit corporation organized and existing  solely for the purposes of either owning
and operating a cemetery or cremating [ dead bodies ] or reducing the bodies of deceased  persons
and burying and caring for [ incinerate] cremated or reduced remains, may purchase or take, by gift
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 11
or devise,  and own and hold lands for the sole purpose of either a cemetery , [ or] a crematory  or
an alternative disposition facility  and burial place for [ incinerate] cremated or reduced remains.
Such lands shall be exempt from execution, and from any appropriation for public purposes,  and lots
or portions of such  land and space in any buildings thereon may be sold, if intended to be used ex-
clusively for burial purposes, and in no wise  with a view to the profit of the members of such cor-
poration. The land so held for cemetery  purposes shall not exceed 600 acres, but if the land already
held for such purpose  by the corporation is all practically used, the amount thereof may be in-
creased by adding thereto not more than  20 acres at any one time. The land so held for the purposes
of a crematory  or alternative disposition facility  and the burial of [ incinerate] cremated or re-
duced remains shall not exceed 30 acres, but if the land already held for such  purposes by the
corporation is all practically used, the amount thereof may be increased by adding thereto not more
than 10 acres at any one time. Lands held for the purposes described in this section  shall be exempt
from taxation as provided in ORS 307.150.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 97.665 is amended to read:
97.665. (1) A nonprofit corporation organized or existing  solely for the purposes of either owning
and operating a cemetery or cremating [ dead bodies ] or reducing the bodies of deceased  persons
and burying and caring for [ incinerate] cremated or reduced  remains may, by its bylaws, provide
that a stated percentage of the money received from  the sale of lots and burial space, cremation
or reduction of bodies, donations,  gifts or other sources of revenue shall constitute an irreducible
fund. Any bylaw enacted for the creation of the irreducible fund cannot be amended to  reduce the
fund.
(2) The board of directors may direct the investment of the money in the irreducible fund,  but
all investments of money deposited in the fund on or after January 1, 1972, shall  be in securities in
classes  and amounts approved by the State Treasurer and published in a list pursuant to ORS 97.820.
If a bank or trust company qualified to engage in  the trust business is directed by the board of di-
rectors to invest the money in the irreducible fund, the bank or trust company shall be governed
by ORS 130.750 to 130.775 and shall not be required  to invest the money according to the list ap-
proved by the State Treasurer. An officer of the corporation shall  file with the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services on or before April 15 of each  year a verified statement
in duplicate containing the same  information pertaining to the irreducible fund as provided in ORS
97.810 (4) regarding  endowment care funds. The director may require the corporation to file, as often
as the director considers it to be necessary, a detailed report of the  conditions and assets of the
irreducible fund.
(3) The interest or income arising from the irreducible fund provided  for in this section or by
any bylaws, or so much thereof as is necessary, shall be devoted exclusively to  the preservation and
embellishment of the grounds, buildings and property of the corporation  and the lots and space in
buildings or grounds sold to the members of the corporation, or  to the payment of the interest or
principal of the debts authorized by subsection (5) of this section for the purchase of land,  erecting
buildings, and improvements.  Any surplus thereof not needed or used for such purposes shall be in-
vested as provided in this section and shall become part of the irreducible fund.
(4) After paying for the land  and the erection of the original buildings and improvements
thereon, all the future receipts and income of the  corporation subject to the provisions in this sec-
tion relating to the creation of an irreducible fund, whether  from the sale of lots and burial space,
cremation  or reduction of bodies, donations,  gifts and other sources, shall be applied exclusively
to laying out, preserving, protecting, embellishing and beautifying  the cemetery , [ or] the crematory
or the  alternative disposition facility  and grounds thereof, and the avenues leading thereto, and
to the  erection of such buildings and improvements as may be necessary or convenient for cemetery
[or], crematory or reduction purposes, and to pay the necessary expenses of the corporation.
(5) No debts shall be  contracted by such corporation in anticipation of any future receipts, ex-
cept for originally purchasing the lands authorized  to be purchased by it, laying out and
embellishing the grounds and avenues, erecting  buildings and vaults on such land, and improving
them for the purposes of the corporation. The corporation may issue  bonds or notes for debts so
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 12
contracted and may secure them by way of mortgage upon any of its lands, buildings,  property and
improvements excepting lots or space conveyed to the members.
SECTION 14.  ORS 97.670 is amended to read:
97.670. If in the board of  directors’ opinion, any portion of the lands of a nonprofit corporation
organized and existing solely for the purposes of  either owning or operating a cemetery or the
cremation [ of dead bodies ] or reduction of bodies of deceased persons  and the burial and  care of
[incinerate] cremated or reduced remains is unsuitable for burial purposes or other purposes  of the
corporation, the board of directors may sell such portion and apply the  proceeds to the general
purposes of such corporation in the same proportion and manner as  provided by ORS 97.660 to
97.680.
SECTION 15.  ORS 97.675 is amended to read:
97.675. Burial lots or space for burial of [ incinerate] cremated or  reduced remains in buildings
or grounds sold by a nonprofit corporation organized and existing solely  for the purposes of either
owning and operating a cemetery or cremating [ dead bodies ] or reducing the bodies  of deceased
persons and burying and caring for [ incinerate] cremated or reduced remains shall be for the sole
purpose of interment or deposit and  safekeeping of [ incinerate] cremated or reduced remains. Such
lots or space shall be exempt from execution, attachment or other lien or process, if used as in-
tended by the purchaser thereof from such corporation, or the assigns or representatives of  the
purchaser, exclusively for burial purposes, and  in no wise with a view to profit. Such lots or space
shall be exempt from taxation as provided in ORS 307.150. The vendor  of any gravestone, however,
shall not be prevented from having and enforcing a lien thereon for all or  part of its purchase price.
If a suit  is brought to enforce such a lien, the judgment therein is enforceable thereafter; and, for
the purpose of enabling the  lien to be had and enforced, the gravestone shall be deemed personal
property and may be severed and removed, under execution and order of  sale, from the lot where
it is situated and may be sold in the same manner as any other personal property.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 97.680 is amended to read:
97.680. (1) As used in this section, “plan” means a document  indicating the placement of lots or
burial spaces, and of the niches or inurnment spaces in the buildings erected  thereon, as established
and authorized by the cemetery authority.
(2) A nonprofit corporation organized and existing solely for the purposes of owning  and oper-
ating a cemetery or cremating [ dead bodies ] or reducing the bodies of deceased persons  and
burying and caring for [ incinerate] cremated or reduced  remains  shall cause a plan of its land and
grounds and  of the lots laid out by it and of the niches or burial space in the buildings erected
thereon to be made and recorded in the  county in which such grounds and land are located, such
lots or spaces to be numbered by regular consecutive  numbers. Such corporation may enclose, im-
prove, and adorn the grounds, buildings, and avenues, prescribe rules for the  designation, improve-
ment and adorning of lots and burial spaces and for erecting monuments, and  prohibit any use,
division, improvement or adornment of a lot or burial space which it may deem improper.
SECTION 17.  ORS 97.720 is amended to read:
97.720. (1) The person in charge of  any premises on which interments [ or], cremations or re-
ductions are made shall keep a record of all  remains interred or cremated or reduced  on the
premises under the person’s charge, in each case stating the  name of each deceased person, the date
of interment [ or], cremation or reduction, and the name and address of  the funeral service practi-
tioner. The interment  records shall be open to inspection by survivors of the decedent during the
customary office hours of the cemetery authority.
(2) A record shall be kept of the  ownership of all plots in the cemetery which have been con-
veyed by the cemetery authority and of all transfers of plots in the cemetery.
SECTION 18.  ORS 97.972 is amended to read:
97.972. (1) When a hospital refers an individual  at or near death to a procurement organization,
the organization  shall make a reasonable search of the records of the Department of Transportation
and any donor registry that it  knows exists for the geographical area in which the individual resides
to ascertain whether the individual has made an anatomical gift.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 13
(2) A procurement organization must be allowed reasonable access to information in  the records
of the  Department of Transportation to ascertain whether an individual at or near death is a donor.
(3) When a hospital refers an individual at or near death to a  procurement organization, the
organization may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to  ensure the medical suitability
of a body part that is or could be the subject of an anatomical gift for transplantation, therapy, re-
search or education  from a donor or a prospective donor. During the examination period, measures
necessary to ensure the  medical suitability of the body part may not be withdrawn unless the hos-
pital or procurement organization knows that the individual expressed a contrary intent.
(4)(a) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, at any time after a donor’s death, the  person to whom
a body part passes under ORS 97.969 may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to ensure
the medical suitability of the body or body part for its intended purpose.
(b) A transplant  hospital may not deny a recipient from receiving an anatomical gift exclusively
on the basis that the recipient is a registry identification cardholder as defined in ORS 475B.791.
(5) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, an examination under subsection (3) or (4)(a)  of this
section may include an  examination of all medical and dental records of the donor or prospective
donor.
(6) Upon the death of a minor who was a donor or had signed a refusal,  unless a procurement
organization knows the minor is emancipated,  the procurement organization shall conduct a rea-
sonable search for the parents of the  minor and provide the parents with an opportunity to revoke
or amend the anatomical gift or revoke the refusal.
(7) Upon referral by a hospital under subsection (1) of this section,  a procurement organization
shall make a reasonable search for any  person listed in ORS 97.965 having priority to make an an-
atomical gift on behalf  of a prospective donor. If a procurement organization receives information
that an anatomical  gift to any other person was made, amended or revoked, it shall promptly advise
the other person of all relevant information.
(8) Subject to ORS 97.969 (9) and 97.980, the rights  of the person to whom a body part passes
under ORS 97.969 are superior to the rights of all others with respect to the body  part. The person
may accept or reject an anatomical gift in whole or in part. Subject to  the terms of the document
of gift and ORS 97.951 to 97.982,  a person who accepts an anatomical gift of an entire body may
allow embalming, burial [ or], cremation or reduction and use of remains in a funeral service. If the
gift is of a body part, the person to whom the body part passes under ORS 97.969, upon the death
of the  donor and before embalming, burial [ or], cremation or reduction, shall cause the body part
to be removed without unnecessary mutilation.
(9) Neither the physician who  attends the decedent at death nor the physician who determines
the time of the decedent’s death  may participate in the procedures for removing or transplanting a
body part from the decedent.
(10) A physician or  technician may remove from the body of a donor a donated body part that
the physician or technician is qualified to remove.
STATE MORTUARY AND CEMETERY BOARD
SECTION 19.
 ORS 692.010 is amended to read:
692.010. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Alkaline hydrolysis” or  “hydrolysis” means the technical process for reducing human
remains by placing the remains in a dissolution chamber that uses heat, pressure, water  and
base chemical agents, in a licensed hydrolysis facility, to  reduce human remains to bone
fragments and essential elements.
[(1)] (2) “Board” means the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board.
[(2)] (3) “Cemetery” means any one, or a combination of more  than one, of the following, in a
place used, or intended to be used, and dedicated, for cemetery purposes:
(a) A burial park, for earth interments;
(b) A mausoleum, for crypt interments;
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 14
(c) A columbarium, for permanent [ cinerary] interments  of cremated or reduced remains ;
(d) A scattering  garden or other designated area above or below ground where a person may
pay to establish a memorial of cremated or reduced remains; or
(e) A cenotaph, the primary purpose of which is to provide an area where a person may pay to
establish a memorial to honor  a person whose remains may be interred elsewhere or whose remains
cannot be recovered.
[(3)] (4) “Exempt operating cemetery” means an operating  cemetery that has 10 or fewer
interments annually.
[(4)] (5) “Final disposition” means  the burial, interment, cremation, dissolution , reduction  or
other disposition of human remains authorized by the board by rule.
[(5)] (6) “Holding room”  means a room that is located in a licensed facility for the care, storage
or holding of dead human bodies prior to effecting disposition.
[(6)] (7) “Immediate  disposition company” means any business licensed under this chapter, other
than a licensed funeral establishment,  where a licensed funeral service practitioner operates the
business of immediate final disposition and where business records are kept.
(8) “Natural organic reduction” means the contained,  accelerated conversion of human
remains to soil.
[(7)] (9) “Operating cemetery” means a cemetery that:
(a) Performs interments;
(b) Has fiduciary responsibility for endowment care, general care or special care funds; or
(c) Has outstanding preneed service contracts for unperformed services.
(10) “Reduced remains” means the remains of a  human body after completion of re-
duction.
(11) “Reduction” means alkaline hydrolysis, natural organic reduction  and any other
method of final disposition of human remains authorized by the board.
[(8)] (12) “Rental cover” means a partial enclosure that  appears similar to a casket that is uti-
lized for viewing purposes and surrounds the burial , [ or] cremation or alternative container.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 692.025 is amended to read:
692.025. (1) An individual may not practice as a funeral service practitioner unless the individual
is licensed as a  funeral service practitioner under ORS 692.045. Regardless of any title used by the
individual, an individual practices as a funeral service practitioner  if the individual is engaged di-
rectly or indirectly in offering  funeral services for payment or supervising or otherwise controlling
the transportation, care, preparation, processing and handling of  dead human bodies before the
bodies undergo final disposition, or before the bodies are transported out of the State of Oregon.
(2) An individual may not practice as an embalmer unless the  individual is licensed as an
embalmer under ORS 692.105. Regardless of any title used by the  individual, an individual practices
as an embalmer if the individual is engaged or purports to be engaged in either of the following:
(a) The practice of disinfecting or preserving from decay dead human bodies.
(b) Preparing human bodies dead of contagious or infectious disease for transportation by  rail-
road, express company or common carrier.
(3) An individual may not practice as a death care consultant unless the individual is  licensed
as a death care consultant under ORS 692.143.  Regardless of any title used by the individual, an
individual practices as  a death care consultant if the individual offers, for payment, consultations
directly relating to the performance of funeral or final disposition services.
(4) A person may not operate a funeral establishment unless the establishment  meets the re-
quirements under this subsection. A place is a funeral establishment if the place is  customarily used
for the care,  preparation or viewing of dead human bodies before the bodies undergo final disposi-
tion, or before the bodies are transported out of the State  of Oregon. A funeral establishment must:
(a) Be licensed by the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board under ORS 692.146;
(b) Be operated by a funeral service practitioner;
(c) Have on the premises embalming facilities or holding room facilities meeting  requirements
established by the board; and
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 15
(d) Have access to hospital or mortuary refrigeration.
(5) A person may not operate an immediate disposition company  unless the immediate disposi-
tion company meets the  requirements under this subsection. An immediate disposition company
must:
(a) Be licensed at a fixed location under ORS 692.146; and
(b) Be operated by a licensed funeral service practitioner.
(6) A person or city, county or other municipal corporation may not conduct  the business of an
operating cemetery without first receiving a certificate of authority  to conduct the business of an
operating cemetery under ORS 692.275.
(7) A person may not operate a crematorium unless the crematorium meets the requirements  of
ORS 692.275.
(8) A person may not operate an alternative disposition facility  unless the facility meets
the requirements of ORS 692.275.
[(8)] (9) An applicant for a license or  certificate described in this section and a principal of a
licensed establishment described in this section must consent to a background check,  including in-
formation solicited from the Department of State Police.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 692.040 is amended to read:
692.040. This chapter does not apply to any of the following:
(1) A public institution, medical college, county medical society, anatomical  association, college
of embalming or  institution approved by the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board to accept bodies
for education or research purposes under ORS 97.170.
(2) The customs or rites of any religious  sect except as to the burial or other disposition of their
dead.
(3) A person who picks up dead human bodies under the  direction of a licensed funeral service
practitioner for delivery to a licensed funeral service practitioner, a licensed  funeral establishment,
an authorized cemetery, an authorized crematorium or another authorized facility for final disposi-
tion of human remains  pursuant to an agreement with the funeral service practitioner, if the person
is not otherwise engaged in any of the activities of  a funeral service practitioner, an embalmer, a
funeral establishment, a death care consultant, a cemetery , [ or] a crematorium or an alternative
disposition facility as described in  ORS 692.025 or another authorized facility for final disposition
of human remains as described in ORS 692.275.
(4) A person who picks up dead  human bodies under the direction of a licensed funeral service
practitioner employed by a funeral establishment  registered under ORS 692.270 for transportation
out of the state or for delivery out of the state to a funeral service practitioner,  funeral establish-
ment, cemetery , [or] crematorium or alternative disposition facility pursuant to an agreement with
the funeral service practitioner, if the person is not otherwise engaged in any of the activities  of a
funeral service practitioner, an embalmer, a funeral establishment, a death care consultant,  a cem-
etery , [ or] a crematorium  or an alternative disposition facility  as described in  ORS 692.025 or
another authorized facility for final disposition of human remains as described in ORS 692.275.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 692.148 is amended to read:
692.148. (1)  If the principals of a licensed funeral establishment or immediate disposition com-
pany change, the establishment or company shall apply to the State Mortuary and  Cemetery Board
for a new license.
(2) A person holding a license or certificate of authority or who is registered under  this chapter
shall apply to the board  for reissuance of the license, certificate or registration if any of the fol-
lowing occur:
(a) The name of the person changes;
(b) The location  of the funeral establishment, immediate disposition company , [ or] crematorium
or alternative disposition facility  changes;
(c) A  trainee registered under ORS 692.190 transfers from one licensed funeral service practi-
tioner or licensed embalmer to another;
(d) The original license, registration or certificate is lost or destroyed; or
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 16
(e) When  a person holding a license or certificate of authority issued under this chapter obtains
another license or certificate of authority issued under this chapter.
(3) The application  for reissuance of the license, registration or certificate shall include payment
of the fee established under ORS 692.160. The board shall reissue the license, certificate  or regis-
tration when the board receives the application and the fee.
SECTION 23.  ORS 692.275 is amended to read:
692.275. (1) A person may not conduct the business of an  operating cemetery unless the person
has a certificate of authority to do so. A person  may apply for a certificate of authority on a form
provided by the State Mortuary and  Cemetery Board. The application must be accompanied by the
application fee established under  ORS 692.160. However, any exempt operating cemetery is entitled
to receive a certificate of authority to operate upon payment of an initial fee not  to exceed $100
and a  fee not to exceed $50 for registration of all principals regardless of the total number of prin-
cipals. An exempt operating cemetery is  not required to pay the renewal fee or the fee for any
change in principal other than the cemetery manager.
(2) A cemetery, other than an operating  cemetery or a historic cemetery listed with the Oregon
Commission on Historic Cemeteries  under ORS 97.782, must be registered with the board. An owner
of a cemetery, other than an operating cemetery  or a historic cemetery listed with the Oregon
Commission on Historic Cemeteries under ORS 97.782, must register the cemetery  with the board
on a form provided by the board. No fee may be required of a cemetery registrant.
(3) A  person may not operate a crematorium unless the person has a certificate of authority to
do so. A person may apply for a certificate of authority to operate a crematorium on a form provided
by the board. The application must be accompanied by the application  fee established under ORS
692.160.
(4) A person may not operate a facility for final disposition of human remains other than
a cemetery or a crematorium unless the person has a certificate of authority to  do so. A
person may apply for a certificate of authority on a form provided  by the board. The appli-
cation must be accompanied by an application fee established under ORS 692.160.
[(4)] (5) For purposes of this section and ORS 692.025, each location of a  cemetery , [ or]
crematorium or other facility for final disposition of human remains  is a  separate location and
must be licensed separately. Those cemeteries that are subject to  registration must be registered
separately.
[(5)] (6) The board may consider the recommendations of national associations :
(a) Related to cremation in adopting rules regulating crematoriums.
(b) Related to an alternative final disposition in adopting  rules regulating the alternative
final disposition.
[(6) A person may not operate a  facility for final disposition of human remains other than a cem-
etery or a crematorium  unless the person has a certificate of authority to do so. A person may apply
for a certificate  of authority on a form provided by the board. The application must be accompanied
by an application fee established under ORS 692.160. ]
(7) This section applies to operating cemeteries or other cemeteries owned  by any city, county
or other municipal corporation.
(8) The board may not subject an exempt operating cemetery to random inspections.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 692.405 is amended to read:
692.405. The funeral service practitioner or person acting  as such shall be responsible for
causing to be affixed to each receptacle, as defined by rule of the  State Mortuary and Cemetery
Board, in which a dead human body  is contained an identifying metal disc, of a design to be ap-
proved by rule of the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board, that shall  remain attached to the re-
ceptacle in which  the body is contained and shall bear a corresponding number that is also in the
report of death and the final disposition permit. In the event of cremation or reduction, the  disc
shall stay with the cremated or reduced remains.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 17
SECTION 25.  ORS 146.121 is amended to read:
146.121. (1) No person shall bury or otherwise dispose of the body of  a person whose death re-
quired investigation, without having first obtained a burial [ or], cremation or reduction permit, or
a report of death completed and signed by a medical examiner.
(2) When a medical examiner  investigates the death of a person whose body is not claimed by
a friend or relative within five days of the date  of death, the sheriff or, in counties having a popu-
lation of 400,000 or more, the medical examiner  shall dispose of the body according to the provisions
of ORS 97.170 to 97.210.
(3) If the medical examiner is unable to dispose of the body of a deceased person  according to
subsection (2) of this section, the medical examiner may order  in writing that the body be either
cremated, reduced or plainly and decently buried.
(4) The sheriff  or medical examiner shall file a copy of the report of death, the order for dispo-
sition and a verified statement of the expenses of the cremation , reduction or burial  with the board
of county commissioners. The board of county commissioners  shall pay such expenses, or any pro-
portion thereof as may be available, from county funds annually budgeted for this purpose.
SECTION 26.  ORS 147.005 is amended to read:
147.005. As used in ORS 147.005 to 147.367 unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Applicant” means:
(a) Any victim of a compensable crime  who applies to the Department of Justice for compen-
sation under ORS 147.005 to 147.367;
(b) Any person  who was a dependent of a deceased victim at the time of the death of that victim;
(c) Any person who is a survivor of a deceased victim; or
(d) Any person eligible for compensation under ORS 147.025.
(2) “Board” means the Workers’ Compensation Board.
(3) “Child”  means an unmarried person who is under 18 years of age and includes a posthumous
child, stepchild or an adopted child.
(4) “Compensable crime” means abuse of corpse in any degree or  an intentional, knowing,
reckless or criminally negligent act that results in  injury or death of another person and that, if
committed by a person of full legal capacity, would be punishable as a crime in this state.
(5) “Counseling” has the meaning given that term by the department by rule.
(6) “Dependent” means such relatives of a deceased  victim who wholly or partially were de-
pendent upon the victim’s income at the time of death or  would have been so dependent but for the
victim’s incapacity due to the injury from which the death resulted.
(7) “Department” means the Department of Justice.
(8) “Funeral expenses” means expenses of the funeral, burial, cremation , reduction  or other
chosen method of interment, including plot or  tomb and other necessary incidents to the disposition
of the remains and also including, in the case of abuse of corpse in any degree, reinterment.
(9) “Injury” means abuse of a corpse or actual bodily harm and, with  respect to a victim, in-
cludes pregnancy and mental or nervous shock.
(10) “International terrorism” means activities that:
(a) Involve violent acts or acts dangerous to human life that are  a violation of the criminal laws
of the United States or any state or that would be a criminal violation  if committed within the ju-
risdiction of the United States or of any state;
(b) Appear to be intended to:
(A) Intimidate or coerce a civilian population;
(B) Influence the policy of a government by intimidation or coercion; or
(C) Affect the conduct of a government by assassination or kidnapping; and
(c) Occur primarily outside the  territorial jurisdiction of the United States or transcend national
boundaries in terms of the means by which they are accomplished, the persons  they appear intended
to intimidate or coerce, or the locale in which their perpetrators operate or seek asylum.
(11) “Involved in the hearing” and “involved in the oral argument” have the meaning  given
those terms by the department by rule.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 18
(12) “Law  enforcement official” means a sheriff, constable, marshal, municipal police officer or
member of the Oregon State Police and such other persons as  may be designated by law as a peace
officer.
(13) “Reduction” has the meaning given that term in ORS 97.010.
[(13)] (14) “Relative” means a person related to  the victim within the third degree as determined
by the common law, a spouse, or an individual related to the spouse within the third degree as  so
determined and includes an individual in an adoptive relationship.
[(14)] (15) “Survivor” means any spouse, parent, grandparent, guardian, sibling, child  or other
immediate family member or household member of a deceased victim.
[(15)] (16) “Victim” means:
(a) A person:
(A) Killed or injured in this state as a result  of a compensable crime perpetrated or attempted
against that person;
(B) Killed or injured in this state  while attempting to assist a person against whom a
compensable crime is being perpetrated or attempted, if that attempt of assistance would be  ex-
pected of a reasonable person under the circumstances;
(C) Killed or injured in this state while assisting a law enforcement official to apprehend  a
person who has perpetrated a crime or  to prevent the perpetration of any such crime, if that as-
sistance was in response to the express request of the law enforcement official;
(D) Killed or injured in another state as a result of a criminal episode that began in this state;
(E) Who is an Oregon resident killed or injured as a result of a compensable crime  perpetrated
or attempted against the person in a state, within the United States,  without a reciprocal crime
victims’ compensation program; or
(F) Who is an Oregon resident killed  or injured by an act of international terrorism committed
outside the United States; or
(b) In the case of abuse of corpse in any degree, the corpse or a relative of the corpse.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 226.410 is amended to read:
226.410. Any incorporated  city may acquire, own, maintain and operate cemeteries , [ and]
crematoria  and other facilities authorized for the disposition of human remains  either inside
or outside its corporate limits, in accordance  with such plans as the city governing body deems best.
SECTION 28.  ORS 409.742 is amended to read:
409.742. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Human Services shall
disclose to the general public the name and the  dates of birth and death of a person whose cremated
or reduced remains are in the possession of the department for the purpose of:
(a) Giving a family member of the person an opportunity to claim  the cremated or reduced re-
mains; and
(b) Creating a memorial  for those persons whose cremated or reduced remains are not claimed.
(2) If an individual  contacts the department to determine whether the department is in pos-
session of the cremated or reduced remains of a family member of the individual and the depart-
ment determines that the department is in possession of the  cremated or reduced  remains, the
department shall disclose to the individual that the department is  in possession of the cremated or
reduced remains and offer the individual the opportunity to claim the remains.
(3) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Alkaline  hydrolysis” or “hydrolysis” means the technical process for reducing human
remains by placing the remains in a dissolution chamber that uses heat, pressure, water  and
base chemical agents, in a licensed hydrolysis facility, to  reduce human remains to bone
fragments and essential elements.
(b) “Family member” means any individual related by blood, marriage or adoption to a  person
whose cremated or reduced remains are in the possession of the department.
(c) “Natural organic reduction” means the  contained, accelerated conversion of human
remains to soil.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 19
(d) “Reduced remains” means the remains of a human body after completion of an  au-
thorized process for  reducing human remains. Authorized processes for reducing human re-
mains include alkaline  hydrolysis, natural organic reduction and any other alternative
process authorized by the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board.
SECTION 29.  ORS 413.195 is amended to read:
413.195. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Family  member” means any individual related by blood, marriage or adoption to a person
whose cremated or reduced remains are in the possession of the Oregon Health Authority.
(b) “Reduced remains” means the remains of a human body after completion of an  au-
thorized process for  reducing human remains. Authorized processes for reducing human re-
mains include alkaline  hydrolysis, natural organic reduction and any other alternative
process authorized by the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authority shall disclose to the general public
the name and the dates of birth and death of a person  whose cremated or reduced remains are in
the possession of the authority for the purpose of:
(a) Giving a family member of the person an opportunity to claim  the cremated or reduced re-
mains; or
(b) Creating a memorial  for those persons whose cremated or reduced remains are not claimed.
(3) If an individual contacts the authority to determine  whether the authority is in possession
of the  cremated or reduced remains of a family member of the individual and the authority deter-
mines that the authority is in possession of the  cremated or reduced remains, the authority shall
disclose to the individual that the authority is in possession of the cremated or reduced remains
and offer the individual the opportunity to claim the remains.
SECTION 30.  ORS 432.005 is amended to read:
432.005. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Alkaline hydrolysis” or  “hydrolysis” means the technical process for reducing human
remains by placing the remains in a dissolution chamber that uses heat, pressure, water  and
base chemical agents, in a licensed hydrolysis facility, to  reduce human remains to bone
fragments and essential elements.
[(1)] (2) “Amendment” means a change to an item that  appears on a certified copy of a vital
record after a certified copy has been issued.
[(2)] (3) “Authorized representative” means an agent designated in a written  statement signed
by the registrant or other qualified applicant, the signing of which was witnessed.
[(3)] (4) “Certified copy” means the document,  in either paper or electronic format, issued by the
State Registrar of the Center for Health Statistics and  containing all or a part of the information
contained on the original vital record, and which, when issued by the  state registrar, has the full
force and effect of the original vital record.
[(4)] (5) “Certified copy item” means any item of information that appears on a certified copy.
[(5)] (6) “Certifier” means a person required to attest  to the accuracy of information submitted
on a report.
[(6)] (7) “Correction” means a change to an item that is not included in a certified copy of a
vital record, or a change to an item that is included in a certified copy  provided that no certified
copy has been issued.
[(7)] (8) “Court of competent jurisdiction” means a court within  the United States with juris-
diction over a person subject to regulation under this chapter.
[(8)] (9) “Date of registration”  means the month, day and year a vital record is incorporated into
the official records of the Center for Health Statistics.
[(9)] (10) “Dead body” means a human body or such parts of such human body from the condition
of which it reasonably may be concluded that death occurred.
[(10)] (11) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol or  process attached to or
logically associated with a contract or other record that is executed  or adopted by a person with
the intent to attest to the accuracy of the facts in the record.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 20
[(11)] (12) “Government agency” means a unit of federal, state, local or tribal government.
[(12)] (13) “Health research” means a systematic study to gain information and understanding
about health, with the goal of finding ways to improve human health, that conforms to or is  con-
ducted in accordance with generally  accepted scientific standards or principles and that is designed
to develop or contribute to general scientific knowledge.
[(13)] (14) “Facts of live birth” means the name of the child, date of birth, place of  birth, sex
and parent’s name or parents’ names appearing on the record of live birth.
[(14)] (15) “Fetal death” means death prior to the complete expulsion or extraction from  its
mother of a product of human conception, irrespective of  the duration of pregnancy, that is not an
induced termination  of pregnancy. The death is indicated by the fact that after such expulsion or
extraction  the  fetus does not breathe or show any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart,
pulsation of the umbilical cord or definite movement of the voluntary muscles.
[(15)] (16) “Final disposition” means the burial, interment, cremation , reduction , removal from
the state or other authorized disposition of a dead body or fetus, except that  when removal from the
state is conducted by the holder of a certificate of removal registration issued under ORS 692.270,
the final disposition may not be considered complete until the report of death is filed.
[(16)(a)] (17)(a) “Human remains” means a dead body.
(b) “Human remains” does not include  [ human ashes ] cremated or reduced human remains
recovered after cremation or reduction.
[(17)(a)] (18)(a) “Induced termination  of pregnancy” means the purposeful interruption of an
intrauterine pregnancy with the intention other than to produce a live-born infant  and that does not
result in a live birth.
(b) “Induced termination of pregnancy” does not include  management of prolonged retention of
products of conception following fetal death.
[(18)] (19) “Institution” means any establishment, public or  private, that provides inpatient or
outpatient medical, surgical or  diagnostic care or treatment or nursing, custodial or domiciliary
care, or to which persons are committed by law.
[(19)] (20) “Interment” means the disposition of human remains by entombment or burial.
[(20)] (21) “Legal representative” means a licensed attorney representing the registrant  or other
qualified applicant.
[(21)] (22) “Live birth”  means the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product
of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, that, after such  expulsion or ex-
traction, breathes or shows any other evidence of life such as beating of the  heart, pulsation of the
umbilical cord or definite movement of voluntary muscles, whether or not  the umbilical cord has
been cut or the placenta is attached.
[(22)] (23) “Medical certifier” means a physician, physician assistant  or nurse practitioner li-
censed under the  laws of this state or under the laws of Washington, Idaho or California who has
treated a decedent within the 12 months preceding death.
(24) “Natural organic reduction” means the contained, accelerated conversion of human
remains to soil.
[(23)] (25) “Person acting as a funeral service practitioner” means:
(a) A person other than a funeral service practitioner licensed under ORS 692.045, including  but
not limited to a relative,  friend or other interested party, who performs the duties of a funeral ser-
vice practitioner without payment; or
(b) A funeral service practitioner who submits  reports of death in another state if the funeral
service practitioner is employed by a funeral establishment licensed in  another state and registered
with the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board under ORS 692.270.
[(24)] (26) “Person in charge of an institution” means the officer or employee who is responsible
for administration of an institution.
[(25)] (27) “Personally identifiable information” means information that can be used to  distin-
guish or trace an individual’s identity  or, when combined with other personal or identifying infor-
mation, is linked or linkable to a specific individual.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 21
[(26)] (28) “Physician” means a person authorized to practice  medicine, chiropractic or
naturopathic medicine under the laws of this state or under  the laws of Washington, Idaho or
California, a physician assistant licensed  under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or a nurse practitioner li-
censed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390.
[(27)] (29) “Record” means a report that has been registered by the state registrar.
[(28)] (30) “Record of foreign live birth” means a document registered by the  state registrar for
a person born in a foreign country who may or  may not be a citizen of the United States and who
was adopted under the laws of this state.
(31) “Reduction” means an authorized  process for reducing human remains. Authorized
processes for reducing human  remains include alkaline hydrolysis, natural organic reduction
and any other alternative process authorized by the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board.
[(29)] (32) “Registration” means the process by  which vital records and reports are accepted and
incorporated into the official records of the Center for Health Statistics.
[(30)] (33) “Report”  means a document, whether in paper or electronic format, containing infor-
mation related to a vital event  submitted by a person required to submit the information to the state
registrar for the purpose of registering a vital event.
[(31)] (34) “State” includes a state or territory of the  United States, the District of Columbia
and New York City.
[(32)] (35) “System of vital statistics” means:
(a) The collection,  registration, preservation, amendment, certification and verification of, and
the maintenance of the security and integrity of, vital records;
(b) The collection of reports required by this chapter; and
(c) Activities related to the activities described in paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this subsection, in-
cluding the tabulation, analysis, dissemination and publication of vital statistics and training in  the
use of health data.
[(33)] (36) “Verification” means confirmation of the information on a vital record based on the
facts contained in a report.
[(34)] (37) “Vital record” means a report of a live birth, death,  fetal death, marriage, declaration
of domestic partnership, dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership and related data  that have
been accepted for registration and incorporated into the official records  of the Center for Health
Statistics.
[(35)] (38) “Vital statistics” means the aggregated data derived from records and  reports of live
birth, death,  fetal death, induced termination of pregnancy, marriage, declaration of domestic part-
nership, dissolution of marriage, dissolution of  domestic partnership and supporting documentation
and related reports.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 801.288 is amended to read:
801.288. (1) “Funeral escort vehicle” means any two-wheel or three-wheel vehicle that is ac-
companying a funeral procession and is properly equipped under ORS 811.800.
(2) “Funeral lead  vehicle” means any vehicle that is properly equipped under ORS 811.800 and
is used to lead and facilitate the movement of a funeral procession.
(3) “Funeral procession” means two or more vehicles, including any funeral lead vehicle or  fu-
neral escort vehicle, accompanying the body  or cremated or reduced remains of a deceased person.
SECTION 32.  ORS 307.150 is amended to read:
307.150. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 307.022, upon compliance  with ORS 307.162, the following
property is exempt from taxation:
(a) Burial grounds,  tombs and rights of burial, and lands and buildings on the land, not exceed-
ing 30 acres, used for the sole purpose of a crematory [ and burial place to incinerate remains ] or
alternative disposition facility, as defined in ORS 97.010, and for burial of incinerated or  re-
duced remains.
(b) Lands used or held exclusively for cemetery purposes, not exceeding 600 acres.
(c) Burial lots or space for burial of [ incinerate remains ] incinerated or reduced remains  in
buildings or grounds used or held exclusively for burial purposes.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 22
(d) Buildings on land described  in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection that are used to store
machinery or equipment used exclusively for maintenance of burial grounds.
(e) Personal property used exclusively for cemetery , [ or] crematory or alternative disposition
facility purposes.
(2) The statement required under ORS 307.162 shall be filed by the owner of the property  de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any property exclusively occupied  and used as a family burial ground is exempt from ad
valorem taxation.
SECTION 33. (1) The  amendments to ORS 97.010, 97.130, 97.145, 97.150, 97.153, 97.170,
97.200, 97.220, 97.510, 97.660, 97.665, 97.670,  97.675, 97.680, 97.720, 97.972, 146.121, 147.005,
226.410, 307.150, 409.742, 413.195, 432.005, 692.010, 692.025, 692.040, 692.148,  692.275, 692.405 and
801.288 by sections 1 to 32 of this 2021 Act become operative on July 1, 2022.
(2) The State Mortuary and Cemetery Board may take  any action before the operative
date specified in subsection  (1) of this section that is necessary for the board to exercise,
on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties,
functions and powers conferred  on the board by the amendments to ORS 692.010, 692.025,
692.040, 692.148, 692.275 and 692.405 by sections 19 to 24 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 34. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
Passed by House April 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 3, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 23